Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 10

Dissolution and Termination

43-38-1001. Dissolution by organizers or initial directors.

A majority of the organizers or initial directors of a cooperative that has not issued membership interest or has not commenced business may dissolve the cooperative by delivering to the secretary of state for filing articles of dissolution and termination that set forth:

The name of the cooperative;

The date of its incorporation;

Either that:

None of the cooperative membership interest have been issued; or

The cooperative has not commenced business;

That no debt of the cooperative remains unpaid;

That the net assets of the cooperative remaining after winding up have been distributed to the members, if membership interests were issued; and

That a majority of the organizers or initial directors authorized the dissolution and the date dissolution was thus authorized.

If the secretary of state finds that the articles of dissolution and termination of its cooperative existence comply with the requirements of subsection (a), the secretary of state shall file the articles of dissolution, except that the termination of its existence shall not take away or impair any remedy to or against the cooperative, its directors, officers or members, for any right of claim existing or any liability incurred, prior to the termination. Any such action or proceeding by or against the cooperative may be prosecuted or defended by the cooperative in its name. The members, directors, and officers have the power to take such action as may be appropriate to protect the remedy, right or claim.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1002. Voluntary dissolution.

A cooperative may be voluntarily dissolved by the written consent of its members in accordance with § 43-38-1008.

A cooperative's board of directors may propose dissolution for submission to the members.

For a proposal to dissolve to be adopted:

The board of directors shall recommend dissolution to the members unless the board of directors determines that because of a conflict of interest or other special circumstances, it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the members; and

The members entitled to vote shall approve the proposal to dissolve as provided in subsection (f).

The board of directors may condition its submission of the proposal for dissolution on any basis.

The cooperative shall notify each member, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed members' meeting in accordance with § 43-38-512. The notice must also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider dissolving the cooperative and that dissolution must be followed by the winding up and termination of the cooperative.

Unless the articles or the board of directors, acting pursuant to subsection (d), require a greater vote or a vote by voting groups, if the proposed dissolution is approved at a meeting by a majority vote, the cooperative must be dissolved and notice of dissolution shall be filed with the office of the secretary of state pursuant to § 43-38-1008.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1003. Grounds for administrative dissolution.

The secretary of state may commence a proceeding under § 43-38-1004 to dissolve administratively the cooperative if:

The cooperative does not deliver its properly completed annual report to the secretary of state within two (2) months after it is due;

The cooperative is without a registered agent or registered office in this state for two (2) months or more;

The name of a cooperative contained in a document filed pursuant to this chapter fails to comply with § 43-38-105;

The cooperative does not notify the secretary of state within two (2) months that its registered agent or registered office has been changed, that its registered agent has resigned, or that its registered office has been discontinued;

The cooperative delivers to the secretary of state's office a check, bank draft, money order or other such instrument for payment of any fee and it is dishonored upon presentation for payment; or

A director, officer, member or other representative of a cooperative signs a document the person knew was false in any material respect with the intent that the document be delivered to the secretary of state for filing.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1004. Procedure for and effect of administrative dissolution.

If the secretary of state determines that one (1) or more grounds exist under § 43-38-1003 for dissolving a cooperative, the secretary of state shall serve the cooperative with written communication of the secretary of state's determination in accordance with §§ 43-38-110 and 43-38-111, except that the determination may be sent by first class mail.

If the cooperative does not correct each ground for dissolution or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the secretary of state that each ground determined by the secretary of state does not exist within two (2) months after service of the communication in accordance with §§ 43-38-110 and 43-38-111, the secretary of state shall administratively dissolve the cooperative by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The secretary of state shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the cooperative in accordance with §§ 43-38-110 and 43-38-111, except that the certificate may be sent by first class mail.

A cooperative administratively dissolved continues its existence but may not carry on any business, except that necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs under § 43-38-1009 and notify claimants under § 43-38-1010.

The administrative dissolution of a cooperative does not terminate the authority of its registered agent.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1005. Reinstatement following administrative dissolution.

A cooperative administratively dissolved under § 43-38-1004 may apply to the secretary of state for reinstatement following administrative dissolution. The application must:

Recite the name of the cooperative at the date of its administrative dissolution;

State that the ground or grounds for dissolution either did not exist or have been eliminated; and

State a cooperative name that satisfies the requirements of § 43-38-105.

If the secretary of state determines that the application contains the information required by subsection (a) and that the information is correct, the secretary of state shall cancel the certificate of dissolution and prepare a certificate of reinstatement that recites the secretary of state's determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate, and serve a copy on the cooperative in accordance with § 43-38-110.

If the cooperative name in subdivision (a)(3) is different than the cooperative name in subdivision (a)(1), the application of reinstatement shall constitute an amendment to the articles insofar as it pertains to the cooperative's name.

When the reinstatement is effective, it relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution and the cooperative shall resume carrying on its business as if the administrative dissolution had never occurred.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1006. Appeal from denial of reinstatement.

If the secretary of state denies a cooperative's application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution, the secretary of state shall serve the cooperative under §§ 43-38-110 and 43-38-111 with a written notice that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

The cooperative may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the chancery court of Davidson County within thirty (30) days after service of the notice of denial. The cooperative may appeal by petitioning the court to set aside the dissolution and attaching to the petition copies of the secretary of state's certificate of dissolution, the cooperative's application for reinstatement, and the secretary of state's notice of denial.

The court may summarily order the secretary of state to reinstate the dissolved cooperative or may take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court's final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1007. Articles of termination following administrative dissolution.

When a cooperative that has been administratively dissolved wishes to terminate its existence, it may do so without first being reinstated, by delivering to the secretary of state for filing articles of termination following administrative dissolution setting forth:

The name of the cooperative;

The date that termination of cooperative existence was authorized;

That the resolution authorizing termination was duly adopted by the members;

A copy of the resolution or the written consent authorizing the termination; and

A statement that all the assets of the cooperative have been distributed to its creditors and members.

If the secretary of state finds that the articles of termination following administrative dissolution comply with the requirements of subsection (a), the secretary of state shall file the articles of termination following administrative dissolution. Upon this filing, the existence of the cooperative shall cease, except that the termination of cooperative existence shall not take away or impair any remedy to or against the cooperative or its members, directors or officers for any right or claim existing or any liability incurred, prior to the termination. Any such action or proceeding by or against the cooperative may be prosecuted or defended by the cooperative in its cooperative name. The members, directors or officers shall have the power to take such cooperative or other action as may be appropriate to protect the remedy, right or claim.

Sections 43-38-1003 — 43-38-1007 shall apply to the administrative dissolution of any domestic cooperative.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1008. Filing notice of dissolution and effect.

If dissolution of the cooperative is approved pursuant to § 43-38-1002(a), the cooperative shall file with the secretary of state a notice of dissolution that contains:

The name of the cooperative; and

If the dissolution is approved pursuant to § 43-38-1002(f), the date of the meeting at which the resolution was approved, and a statement that the requisite vote of the members was received, or that members validly took action without a meeting.

When the notice of dissolution has been filed with the secretary of state, the cooperative shall cease to carry on its business, except to the extent necessary for the winding up of the business of the cooperative. The members shall retain the right to revoke the dissolution in accordance with § 43-38-1013 and the right to remove or appoint directors or officers. The cooperative existence continues to the extent necessary to wind up the affairs of the cooperative until the dissolution is revoked or articles of termination are filed with the secretary of state.

As part of winding up, the cooperative may participate in a merger with another cooperative or one (1) or more domestic business entities under §§ 43-38-122 and 43-38-123, but the dissolved cooperative shall not be the surviving business entity.

The filing with the secretary of state of a notice of dissolution does not affect any remedy in favor of the cooperative or any remedy against it or its members, directors, or officers in those capacities, except as provided in § 43-38-1010.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1009. Collection and payment of debts — Transfer of assets — Distribution to members.

After the notice of intent to dissolve has been filed with the secretary of state, the board, or the officers acting under the direction of the board, shall proceed as soon as possible to:

Collect or make provision for the collection of all debts due or owing to the cooperative, including unpaid subscriptions for shares; and

Pay or make provision for the payment of all debts, obligations and liabilities of the cooperative according to their priorities.

After the notice of intent to dissolve has been filed with the secretary of state, the board may sell, lease, transfer or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of the property and assets of the dissolving cooperative without a vote of the members.

Tangible and intangible property, including money, remaining after the discharge of the debts, obligations and liabilities of the cooperative may be distributed to the members and former members as provided in the bylaws. If previously authorized by the members, the tangible and intangible property of the cooperative may be liquidated and disposed of at the discretion of the board.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1010. Known and unknown claims against cooperative.

When a notice of dissolution has been filed with the secretary of state, and the business of the cooperative is not to be wound up and terminated by merging the dissolved cooperative into a successor organization under § 43-38-122, then the cooperative may give notice of the filing to each creditor of and claimant against the cooperative, known or unknown, present or future, and contingent or noncontingent, in accordance with subsections (b) and (c).

A cooperative may dispose of the known claims against it by following the procedure described in this subsection (b).

The dissolved cooperative shall notify its known claimants in writing of the dissolution at any time after the effective date of the dissolution. The written notice must:

Describe information that must be included in a claim;

State whether the claim is admitted, or not admitted, and if admitted:

The amount that is admitted, which may be as of a given date; and

Any interest obligation if fixed by an instrument of indebtedness;

Provide a mailing address where a claim may be sent;

State the deadline, which may not be fewer than four (4) months from the effective date of the written notice, by which the dissolved cooperative must receive the claim; and

State that, except to the extent that any claim is admitted, the claim will be barred if written notice of the claim is not received by the deadline.

A claim against the dissolved cooperative is barred to the extent that the dissolved cooperative delivered written notice to the claimant:

In accordance with subdivision (b)(2) and the claimant did not deliver a written notice of the claim to the dissolved cooperative by the deadline; or

That the claimant's claim is rejected, in whole or in part, and the claimant did not commence a proceeding to enforce the claim within three (3) months from the effective date of the rejection notice.

For purposes of this section, “claim” does not include a contingent liability or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

For purposes of this section, written notice is effective at the earliest of the following:

When received;

Five (5) days after its deposit in the United States mail, if mailed correctly addressed and with first class postage affixed;

On the date shown on the return receipt, if sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, and the receipt signed by or on behalf of the addressee; or

Twenty (20) days after deposit in the United States mail, as evidenced by the postmark if mailed correctly addressed, and with other than first class, registered or certified postage affixed.

A dissolved cooperative may also publish notice of its dissolution and request that persons with claims against the cooperative present them in accordance with the notice.

The notice must:

Be published one (1) time in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the dissolved cooperative's principal executive office is or was last located;

Describe the information that must be included in a claim and provide a mailing address where the claim may be sent; and

State that a claim against the cooperative will be barred unless a proceeding to endorse the claim is commenced within two (2) years after the publication of the notice.

If the cooperative publishes a newspaper notice in accordance with subsection (b), the claim of each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences a proceeding to endorse the claim against the dissolved cooperative within two (2) years after the publication date of the newspaper notice:

A claimant who did not receive written notice under subsection (b);

A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the dissolved cooperative but not acted on; or

A claimant whose claim is contingent or based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

A claim may be enforced under this subsection (c):

Against the dissolved cooperative, to the extent of its undistributed assets; or

If the assets have been distributed in liquidation, against a member of the dissolved cooperative to the extent of the member's pro rata share of the claim or the cooperative assets distributed to the member in liquidation, whichever is less, but a member's total liability for all claims under this subsection (c) may not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the member.

If the dissolved cooperative does not comply with subsections (b) and (c), claimants against the cooperative may enforce their claims:

Against the dissolved cooperative to the extent of its undistributed assets; or

If the assets have been distributed in liquidation, against a member of the dissolved cooperative to the extent of the member's pro rata share of the claim or the cooperative assets distributed to the member in liquidation, whichever is less, but a member's total liability for all claims under this section may not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the member; provided however, that a claim may not be enforced against a member of a dissolved cooperative who received a distribution in liquidation after three (3) years from the date of the filing of articles of termination.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1011. Claims against dissolving cooperative.

The claim of a creditor or claimant against a dissolving cooperative is barred if the claim has not been enforced by initiating legal, administrative or arbitration proceedings concerning the claim by two (2) years after the date the notice of intent to dissolve is filed with the secretary of state.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1012. Filing of articles of termination upon dissolution and completion of winding up of cooperative.

The articles of termination shall be filed with the secretary of state upon the dissolution and the completion of winding up the cooperative.

Articles of termination shall set forth:

The name of the cooperative;

The date of filing of its articles of organization;

The reason for the filing of the articles of termination;

Whether known and potential creditors and claimants have been notified of the dissolution under § 43-38-1010; and

Any other information that the person filing the articles of termination determines necessary or desirable to include.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1013. Revocation of dissolution proceedings.

Dissolution proceedings may be revoked before the articles of dissolution are filed with the secretary of state.

The chair may call a members' meeting to consider the advisability of revoking the dissolution proceedings. The question of the proposed revocation shall be submitted to the members at the members' meeting called to consider the revocation. The dissolution proceedings are revoked if the proposed revocation is approved at the members' meeting by a majority of the members of the cooperative, or for a cooperative with articles or bylaws requiring a greater number of members, the number of members required by the articles or bylaws.

After the revocation of dissolution is authorized, the cooperative may revoke the dissolution by delivering to the secretary of state for filing articles of revocation of dissolution that set forth:

The name of the cooperative;

The effective date of the dissolution that was revoked;

The date that the revocation of dissolution was authorized;

If the cooperative board of directors, or incorporators, revoked the dissolution, a statement to that effect;

If the cooperative's board of directors revoked a dissolution authorized by the members, a statement that revocation was permitted by action by the board of directors alone pursuant to that authorization; and

If member action was required to revoke the dissolution, a statement that the resolution was duly adopted by the members and a copy of the resolution or the written consent authorizing the revocation of dissolution.

If a revocation of dissolution is effective, it relates back to and takes effect upon the effective date of the dissolution and the cooperative shall resume carrying on its business as if dissolution had never occurred.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1014. Termination of existence.

The existence of the cooperative is terminated upon the filing of articles of termination with the secretary of state.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1015. Dissolution under the supervision of the court.

After a notice of intent to dissolve has been filed with the secretary of state and before a certificate of dissolution has been issued, the cooperative or, for good cause shown, a member or creditor, may apply to a court within the county where the registered address is located to have the dissolution conducted or continued under the supervision of the court as provided in § 43-38-1018.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1016. Judicial intervention.

A court may grant any equitable relief it considers just and reasonable in the circumstances or may dissolve a cooperative or direct that the dissolved entity is merged into another or new cooperative or other entity on the terms and conditions the court deems equitable.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1017. Judicial dissolution.

On application by the attorney general and reporter, or by or for a member, the court may decree dissolution of a cooperative whenever it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in conformity with the articles and the operating agreement.

The dissolution is effective upon the decree of dissolution becoming final and not eligible for appeal. The decree shall be filed with the office of the secretary of state.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1018. Procedure for judicial dissolution.

In dissolution proceedings, before a hearing is completed, the court may:

Issue injunctions;

Appoint receivers with all powers and duties that the court directs;

Take actions required to preserve the cooperative's assets wherever located; and

Carry on the business of the cooperative.

After a hearing is completed, on notice the court directs to be given to parties to the proceedings and to other parties in interest designated by the court, the court may appoint a receiver to collect the cooperative's assets, including amounts owing to the cooperative by subscribers on account of an unpaid portion of the consideration for the issuance of shares. A receiver has authority, subject to the order of the court, to continue the business of the cooperative and to sell, lease, transfer, or otherwise dispose of the property and assets of the cooperative either at public or private sale.

The assets of the cooperative or the proceeds resulting from a sale, lease, transfer, or other disposition shall be applied in the following order of priority:

The costs and expenses of the proceedings, including attorneys' fees and disbursements;

Debts, taxes and assessments due the United States, this state and other states in that order;

Claims duly proved and allowed to employees under the workers' compensation act, except that claims under this clause may not be allowed if the cooperative has carried workers' compensation insurance, as provided by law, at the time the injury was sustained;

Claims, including the value of all compensation paid in a medium other than money, proved and allowed to employees for services performed within three (3) months preceding the appointment of the receiver, if any; and

Other claims proved and allowed.

After payment of the expenses of receivership and claims of creditors are proved, the remaining assets, if any, may be distributed to the members or distributed pursuant to an approved liquidation plan.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1019. Receivership.

A receiver shall be a natural person or a domestic corporation in this state. A receiver shall give a bond as directed by the court with the sureties required by the court.

A receiver may sue and defend in all courts as receiver of the cooperative. The court appointing the receiver has exclusive jurisdiction of the cooperative and its property.

The receiver and the court appointed receiver shall have the same powers and duties as a court appointed receiver would have pursuant to § 48-24-303.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1020. Filing of claims.

In proceedings to dissolve a cooperative, the court may require all creditors and claimants of the cooperative to file their claims under oath with the court administrator or with the receiver in a form prescribed by the court.

If the court requires the filing of claims, the court shall:

Set a date, by order, at least one hundred twenty (120) days after the date the order is filed, as the last day for the filing of claims; and

Prescribe the notice of the fixed date that shall be given to creditors and claimants.

Before the fixed date, the court may extend the time for filing claims. Creditors and claimants failing to file claims on or before the fixed date may be barred, by order of court, from claiming an interest in or receiving payment out of the property or assets of the cooperative.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1021. Discontinuation of dissolution for lack of cause.

The involuntary or supervised voluntary dissolution of a cooperative may be discontinued at any time during the dissolution proceedings, if it is established that cause for dissolution does not exist. The court shall dismiss the proceedings and direct the receiver, if any, to redeliver to the cooperative its remaining property and assets.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1022. Court order dissolving cooperative.

In an involuntary or supervised voluntary dissolution, after the costs and expenses of the proceedings and all debts, obligations and liabilities of the cooperative have been paid or discharged and the remaining property and assets have been distributed to its members, or if its property and assets are not sufficient to satisfy and discharge the costs, expenses, debts, obligations and liabilities, when all the property and assets have been applied so far as they will go to their payment according to their priorities, the court shall enter an order dissolving the cooperative.

When the order dissolving the cooperative or association has been entered, the cooperative or association is dissolved.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1023. Certified copy of dissolution.

After the court enters an order dissolving a cooperative, the court administrator shall cause a certified copy of the dissolution order to be filed with the secretary of state. The secretary of state may not charge a fee for filing the dissolution order.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1024. Liquidation.

A cooperative shall be dissolved as provided in the articles in a manner consistent with other business entities organized in this state, or if not provided, may be dissolved in the same manner as a limited liability company organized in this state; or the members may authorize a liquidation by adopting a resolution at a members' meeting. The liquidation may occur with or without a vote of dissolution. The notice of the members' meeting shall include a statement that the disposition of all or substantially all of the assets of the cooperative will be considered at the meeting. If a quorum is present in person, by mail ballot, or alternative method approved by the board at the members' meeting, the resolution approving of the liquidation is adopted if:

Approved by two thirds (2/3) of the votes cast; or

For a cooperative with articles or bylaws requiring more than two thirds (2/3) for approval and other conditions for approval, the resolution is approved by the proportion of the votes cast or a number of total members as required by the articles or bylaws and the conditions for approval in the articles or bylaws have been satisfied.

The board of directors by resolution may liquidate a cooperative, if the board obtains an opinion of a certified public accountant that the cooperative is unlikely to continue as a business based on its current finances.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1025. Right to sue or defend after dissolution.

After a cooperative has been dissolved, any of its former officers, directors or members may assert or defend, in the name of the cooperative, a claim by or against the cooperative.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1026. Equitable relief — Dissolution and liquidation.

A court may grant equitable relief that it deems just and reasonable in the circumstances or may dissolve a cooperative and liquidate its assets and business:

In a supervised voluntary dissolution that is applied for by the cooperative;

In an action by a member when it is established that:

The directors or the persons having the authority otherwise vested in the board are deadlocked in the management of the cooperative's affairs and the members are unable to break the deadlock;

The directors or those in control of the cooperative have acted fraudulently, illegally or in a manner unfairly prejudicial toward one (1) or more members in their capacities as members, directors or officers;

The members of the cooperative are so divided in voting power that, for a period that includes the time when two (2) consecutive regular members' meetings were held, they have failed to elect successors to directors whose terms have expired or would have expired upon the election and qualification of their successors;

The cooperative assets are being misapplied or wasted; or

The period of duration as provided in the articles has expired and has not been extended as provided in this chapter;

In an action by a creditor when:

The claim of the creditor against the cooperative has been reduced to judgment and an execution on the judgment has been returned unsatisfied; or

The cooperative has admitted in writing that the claim of the creditor against the cooperative is due and owing and it is established that the cooperative is unable to pay its debts in the ordinary course of business; or

In an action by the attorney general and reporter to dissolve the cooperative in accordance with this subsection (a), when it is established that a decree of dissolution is appropriate.

In determining whether to order equitable relief or dissolution, the court shall take into consideration the financial condition of the cooperative, but may not refuse to order equitable relief or dissolution solely on the ground that the cooperative has accumulated operating net income or current operating net income.

In deciding whether to order dissolution of the cooperative, the court shall consider whether lesser relief suggested by one (1) or more parties, such as a form of equitable relief or a partial liquidation, would be adequate to permanently relieve the circumstances established under subdivision (a)(2)(B) or (a)(2)(C). Lesser relief may be ordered if it would be appropriate under the facts and circumstances of the case.

If the court finds that a party to a proceeding brought under this section has acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or otherwise not in good faith, the court may in its discretion award reasonable expenses, including attorneys' fees and disbursements, to any of the other parties.

Proceedings under this section shall be brought in a court within the county where the registered address of the cooperative is located.

It is not necessary to make members parties to the action or proceeding unless relief is sought against them personally.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.

43-38-1027. Claims procedure.

A person who is or who becomes a creditor or claimant before, during, or following the conclusion of dissolution proceedings, who does not file a claim or pursue a remedy in a legal, administrative or arbitration proceeding during the pendency of the dissolution proceeding, or has not initiated a legal, administrative, or arbitration proceeding before the commencement of the dissolution proceedings, and all those claiming through or under the creditor or claimant, are forever barred from suing on that claim or otherwise realizing upon or enforcing it, except as provided in this section.

Within one (1) year after articles of dissolution have been filed with the secretary of state pursuant to this chapter or a dissolution order has been entered, a creditor or claimant who shows good cause for not having previously filed the claim may apply to a court in this state to allow a claim:

Against the cooperative to the extent of undistributed assets; or

If the undistributed assets are not sufficient to satisfy the claim, the claim may be allowed against a member to the extent of distributions in dissolution received by the member.

Debts, obligations and liabilities incurred during dissolution proceedings shall be paid or provided for by the cooperative before the distribution of assets to a member. A person to whom this kind of debt, obligation, or liability is owed but is not paid may pursue any remedy against the officers, directors or members of the cooperative before the expiration of the applicable statute of limitations. This subsection (c) does not apply to dissolution under the supervision or order of a court.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 32.